dictsource/he_rules
// ***************************************************************************
// *   Copyright (C) 2005 to 2014 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
// *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
// *                                                                         *
// *   Copyright (C) 2021 Hebrew Contribution by Carmit Vinik                *
// *   email: carmitvinik@gmail.com                                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/
// File Encoding: UTF-8
// Language-Name: Hebrew
// Language-Family: sem
// Language Code: he
// Contributors: [["carmitvinik@gmail.com"],["anyoneElse.?.@"]]
// 
// ***************************************************************************/

// ה בסוף מילה שותקת
// א בסוף מילה שותקת
// ובתיחלת מילה מילת חיבור
// בגדכפת בראש מילה מודגש קל
// אותיות מש"ה – מילת היחס מ', ש' הזיקה, ה' הידיעה
// אותיות משה בתחילת מילה
// מ עם חיריק
// ש עם סגול
// ה הידיעה עם פתח ואחריה דגש אם האות גרונית לפעמים סגול
//  וכלב מנוקדות בשווה שנשמע כמו צרה
// ו החיבור
//  ו החיבור לפני אותיות בומפ הופכת לשורוק
//  לפני מילה המתחילה ביוד  היא הופכת לחיריק ואחריה התנועה שווה
//  באותיות כלב יש מספר מילים יוצאות דופן
// https://hebrew-academy.org.il/2013/07/18/%D7%A0%D7%99%D7%A7%D7%95%D7%93-%D7%90%D7%95%D7%AA%D7%99%D7%95%D7%AA-%D7%94%D7%A9%D7%99%D7%9E%D7%95%D7%A9/






.replace
'      ^



// Letters
.L01 א ב ג ד ה ו ז ח ט י כ ל מ נ ס ע פ צ ק ר ש ת
// suffix letters 
.L02 ך ם ן ף ץ 
// אם קריאה שאינה מייצגת עיצור
.L03 א ה ו י
// סוכם שאין דבר כזה קמץ קטן ונקרא בסגנון ספרד שהקמץ לעולם לא קמץ קטן
// אותיות גרוניות אהעח עם חתפים



.group ^
       _)^   merxa
       // Hebrew letters with mercha
       _א_)^(_     'alef||              
       _ב_)^(_	bet||
       _ג_)^(_	'gimel||
       _ד_)^(_	'dalet||
       _ה_)^(_	he||
       _ו_)^(_	vav||
       _ז_)^(_	z'ajin||
       _ח_)^(_	xet||
       _ט_)^(_	tet||
       _י_)^(_	jod||
       _ך_)^(_	kaf||sofit||
       _כ_)^(_	kaf||
       _ל_)^(_	l'amed||
       _ם_)^(_	mem||sofit||
       _מ_)^(_	mem||
       _ן_)^(_	nun||sofit||
       _נ_)^(_	nun||
       _ס_)^(_	s'amex||
       _ע_)^(_	?'ajin||
       _ף_)^(_	pe||sofit||
       _פ_)^(_	pe||
       _ץ_)^(_	ts'adi||sofit||
       _צ_)^(_	ts'adi||
       _ק_)^(_	kuf||
       _ר_)^(_	ReS||
       _ש_)^(_	S'in||
       _ת_)^(_	tav||
       // letters with mercha which is sound different
       _ג_)^(י       dZi
       _ג_)^(_י     dZi
       _ג_)^(_יL01   dZi
       _ג_)^(_ינL01  dZin
       L01ג_)^(_י_   dZi

        _ג_)^(_יסL01  dZis
        L01ג_)^(_יס   dZis
       _ג_)^(_ירפה     dZi|R'afa||

      
